Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1218
Appraisal, defined.

Appraisal shall mean a written statement independently and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinion of defined value of an adequately described property as of a specific date supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 5.